Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2714
Terms; references; incorporation of federal law.

Any term used in sections 77-2714 to 77-27,123 shall have the same meaning as when used in a comparable context in the laws of the United States relating to federal income taxes, unless a different meaning is clearly required. Any reference to the laws of the United States shall mean the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and amendments thereto, other provisions of the laws of the United States relating to federal income taxes, and the rules and regulations issued under such laws, as the same may be or become effective, at any time or from time to time, for the taxable year. Any reference to either the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or the Internal Revenue Code shall mean and include a reference to the other, whenever appropriate. All other references to any tax contained within sections 77-2714 to 77-27,123 refer to income tax unless the contrary appears. Any organization to the extent that it is exempt from income taxes under the laws of the United States shall be exempt from income tax under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 14, p. 1575;

Laws 1987, LB 6, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 773, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 523, § 18.